Illinois, session 104th, SB1331.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Scholarship Accessibility Act. 6    Section 5. Illinois Scholarship Database.7    (a) The Illinois Scholarship Database is established. The 8Illinois Student Assistance Commission shall develop, 9implement, and administer the Database.10    (b) The Database shall be both a website and an 11application so that the Database is publicly accessible and 12easy to use.13    (c) The purpose of the Database is to be a utility to 14improve Illinois students' access to higher education 15scholarships, as well as to improve their knowledge of 16scholarships.17    (d) To inform students and their parents on what 18scholarships are and how they are attained and maintained, all 19of the following apply:20        (1) Beginning in the 7th grade, a public school shall 21    inform students of the Database and shall require them to 22    create an account with the Database. The account may not 23    be under any administrative body that has access to or the   SB1331 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 07500 LNS 17544 b1    ability to terminate the email used to register for the 2    account.3        (2) To help consistently keep parents informed of the 4    importance of scholarships and financial aid, the account 5    shall be created jointly by the student and the parent, 6    with a clear indication of which user is the student and 7    which user is the parent.8        (3) Both the student and the parent shall have access 9    to the account and the ability to manage activity on the 10    account.11    (e) The Database shall allow the student to have and the 12student is required to complete a profile that does both of the 13following:14        (1) Presents a portfolio of the student and who the 15    student is and the student's current year of enrollment. 16    This requirement shall be a part of the account-creation 17    process and may not be different for students of different 18    ages.19        (2) Lists any criminal charge that requires the 20    student to be a part of a registry for a crime the student 21    has committed, unless the student is legally protected 22    under law or court order or another exigent circumstance. 23    This paragraph (2) does not apply to a student until the 24    student has finished high school. This paragraph (2) does 25    apply to a student who is considered to have failed high 26    school.   SB1331 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 07500 LNS 17544 b1    Section 10. Database contents.2    (a) The Database shall include and display a comprehensive 3list of scholarships as follows:4        (1) Entities or persons that offer higher education 5    scholarships shall be allowed to add their scholarships 6    and the requirements for those scholarships to the 7    Database if the requirements do not:8            (A) offer a scholarship opportunity only at 9        particular higher education institutions without being 10        completely transparent as to which higher education 11        institutions the scholarship opportunity is offered 12        at;13            (B) offer a scholarship opportunity without 14        showing all of the requirements to obtain the 15        scholarship opportunity; or16            (C) have troublesome or absurd requirements that 17        are not appropriate for higher education institutions.18        (2) More widely known scholarships from anywhere in 19    the country may be displayed if they are accessible to 20    students in this State.21    (b) The Illinois Student Assistance Commission shall be 22responsible for funding scholarship workshops that can be 23viewed by all students and other events decided upon by the 24Commission to help inform students and parents and make them 25aware of scholarships.   SB1331 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 07500 LNS 17544 b1    Section 15. Adult student access.2    (a) Students 18 years of age or older shall also be able to 3create an account with and have access to the Database. These 4students shall be able to maintain an account without the 5requirement of having a parent have access to the account. A 6student who created an account prior to turning 18 may remove 7the student's parent from the account after reaching the age 8of 18.9    (b) The requirements of subsection (e) of Section 5 shall 10apply to an account created by a student 18 years of age or 11older.12    (c) The Database shall remain accessible to any student 13who uses it, regardless of age.